Tennessee statutes. Title 63 Professions Of The Healing Arts
Chapter 32

Health Care Consumer Right-to-Know Act of 1998

This chapter, title 63, chapter 32 was renumbered from title 63, chapter 51 by authority of the Code Commission in 2017.

63-32-101. Short title.

The title of this chapter is and may be cited as the “Health Care Consumer Right-to-Know Act of 1998.”

Acts 1998, ch. 1073, § 1; T.C.A § 63-51-101.

Compiler's Notes. Former § 63-51-101 was transferred to this section by the authority of the Code Commission in 2017.

63-32-102. Health care consumers.

Health care is a valuable commodity, and the health care consumer needs to make informed decisions when making health care choices. Due to the current trends in health care, patients have a close relationship with their health care provider and must depend on the provider for most of their health care needs. Health care consumers need to know as much as possible before committing their health care to such provider. Likewise current trends make decisions about which managed care organizations to choose equally important to health care consumers. Because of the foregoing reasons and because of the increasing concerns over the quality of health care, the general assembly finds that a system should be established to provide public access to information about certain health care providers and managed care organizations in this state.

For the purposes of this chapter, “provider” or “health care provider” means a physician, regulated pursuant to chapter 6 of this title; osteopathic physician, regulated pursuant to chapter 9 of this title; chiropractor, regulated pursuant to chapter 4 of this title; dentist, regulated pursuant to chapter 5 of this title; podiatrist, regulated pursuant to chapter 3 of this title; optometrist, regulated pursuant to chapter 8 of this title; dietitian or nutritionist, regulated pursuant to chapter 25 of this title; physician assistant, regulated pursuant to chapter 19 of this title; respiratory care practitioner, regulated pursuant to chapter 27 of this title; pharmacist, regulated pursuant to chapter 10 of this title; audiologist and speech pathology therapist, regulated pursuant to chapter 17 of this title; certified nurse practitioner, as such nurses are regulated pursuant to § 63-7-123; registered nurse anesthetist, regulated pursuant to chapter 7 of this title; social worker regulated pursuant to chapter 23 of this title; psychologist, regulated pursuant to chapter 11 of this title; professional counselor, marital and family therapist, and clinical pastoral therapist regulated pursuant to chapter 22 of this title; massage therapist, regulated pursuant to chapter 18 of this title; medical laboratory personnel, regulated pursuant to title 68, chapter 29; alcohol and drug abuse counselors, regulated pursuant to title 68, chapter 24; occupational therapist and physical therapist regulated pursuant to chapter 13 of this title; dispensing optician, regulated pursuant to chapter 14 of this title; electrologist, regulated pursuant to chapter 26 of this title; veterinarian, regulated by chapter 12 of this title; and nursing home administrator, regulated pursuant to chapter 16 of this title.

Acts 1998, ch. 1073, § 2; 1999, ch. 373, § 3; 2000, ch. 912, § 1; 2003, ch. 272, § 1; T.C.A § 63-51-102.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2000, ch. 912, § 2 provided that the act shall not be construed to be an appropriation of funds and no funds shall be obligated or expended pursuant to the act unless such funds are specifically appropriated by the General Appropriations Fund.

Former § 63-51-102 was transferred to this section by the authority of the Code Commission in 2017.

63-32-103. Duties of division of health related boards.

It is the duty of the division of health related boards to compile, consolidate, manage and disseminate the information collected by entities of the department of health and the department of commerce and insurance as required by this chapter.

Acts 1998, ch. 1073, § 3; T.C.A § 63-51-103.

Compiler's Notes. Former § 63-51-103 was transferred to this section by the authority of the Code Commission in 2017.

63-32-104. Requirements.

When collecting information or compiling reports intended to compare individual health care providers, the commissioner of health shall require that:

Provider organizations that are representative of the target group for profiling shall be meaningfully involved in the development of all aspects of the profile methodology, including collection methods, formatting and methods and means for release and dissemination;

The entire methodology for collecting and analyzing the data shall be disclosed to all relevant provider organizations and to all providers under review;

Data collection and analytical methodologies shall be used that meet accepted standards of validity and reliability;

The limitations of the data sources and analytic methodologies used to develop provider profiles shall be clearly identified and acknowledged, including, but not limited to, the appropriate and inappropriate uses of the data;

To the greatest extent possible, provider-profiling initiatives shall use standard-based norms derived from widely accepted, provider-developed practice guidelines;

Provider profiles and other information that have been compiled regarding provider performance shall be shared with providers under review prior to dissemination; provided, that an opportunity for corrections and additions of helpful explanatory comments shall be provided prior to publication; and provided, further, that such profiles shall only include data that reflect care under the control of the provider for whom such profile is prepared;

Comparisons among provider profiles shall adjust for patient care-mix and other relevant risk factors and control for provider peer groups, when deemed appropriate by the respective board; and

The quality and accuracy of provider profiles, data sources and methodologies shall be evaluated at least biannually.

The department of health is authorized to charge a reasonable fee for any information, documents, or reports requested by the public that are not required as part of the implementation of this chapter. The fee shall be set per rules and regulations promulgated by the department in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

Acts 1998, ch. 1073, § 4; T.C.A § 63-51-104.

Compiler's Notes. Former § 63-51-104 was transferred to this section by the authority of the Code Commission in 2017.

63-32-105. Information for public dissemination.

Each board regulating a provider, as defined in § 63-32-102, shall collect the following information and provide to the department of health in order for the department to create individual profiles on licensees, in a format created by the department that shall be available for dissemination to the public:

A description of any criminal convictions for felonies and, as determined by the board, serious misdemeanors, within the most recent ten (10) years. For the purposes of this subsection (a), a person shall be deemed to be convicted of a crime if such person was found or adjudged guilty by a court of competent jurisdiction. Misdemeanor convictions later expunged by a court of competent jurisdiction shall be stricken from the provider's profile;

A description of any final board disciplinary actions within the most recent ten (10) years, which actions shall include final board action as defined by § 4-5-314, and reprimand action taken pursuant to a board practice act;

A description of any final disciplinary actions of licensing boards in other states within the most recent ten (10) years;

A description of revocation or involuntary restriction of hospital privileges for reasons related to competence or character that has been taken by the hospital's governing body or any other official action of the hospital after procedural due process has been afforded, or the resignation from or nonrenewal of medical staff membership or the restriction of privileges at a hospital taken in lieu of or in settlement of a pending disciplinary case related to competence or character in that hospital, all as taken pursuant to procedures promulgated by the board for licensing health care facilities. Only cases that have occurred within the most recent ten (10) years shall be disclosed by the department to the public;

All health care liability court judgments, all health care liability arbitration awards in which a payment is awarded to a complaining party and all settlements of health care liability claims in which a payment is made to a complaining party beginning with reports for 1998 and each subsequent year; provided, such reports shall not be disseminated beyond the most recent ten-year period, but shall include the most recent ten-year period for which reports have been filed. Each provider licensing board shall set by rule adopted pursuant to the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5, a threshold amount below which judgments or settlements shall not be reportable; provided, such threshold shall, for chapter 6 or 9 of this title licensees, be set at seventy-five thousand dollars ($75,000), for doctors of chiropractic, regulated pursuant to chapter 4 of this title, be set at fifty thousand dollars ($50,000), for dentists, regulated pursuant to chapter 5 of this title, be set at twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000), and for all other licensees under this title be set at ten thousand dollars ($10,000). Dispositions of paid claims shall be reported in a minimum of three (3) graduated categories indicating the level of significance of the award or settlement. Information concerning paid health care liability claims shall be put in context by comparing an individual licensee's health care liability judgment awards and settlements to the experience of other providers within the same specialty. Information concerning the existence of a court-sealed settlement shall be reported in cases involving such a settlement. Information concerning all settlements shall be accompanied by the following statement: “Settlement of a claim may occur for a variety of reasons which do not necessarily reflect negatively on the professional competence or conduct of the provider. A payment in settlement of a health care liability action or claim should not be construed as creating a presumption that health care liability has occurred.” Nothing in this subdivision (a)(5) shall be construed to limit or prevent the department from providing further explanatory information regarding the significance of categories in which settlements are reported;

Pending health care liability claims shall not be disclosed by a board to the public. Nothing in this subdivision (a)(5) shall be construed to prevent a board from investigating and disciplining a licensee on the basis of health care liability claims that are pending;

Names of medical schools or professional and training schools and dates of graduation;

Graduate medical education or other graduate-level training;

Specialty board certification as determined by the relevant board;

Names of the hospitals where the licensee has privileges;

Appointments to medical school faculties and indication as to whether a licensee has a responsibility for graduate medical education within the most recent ten (10) years;

Information regarding publications in peer-reviewed medical literature;

Information regarding professional or community service associations, activities and awards;

The location of the licensee's primary practice setting;

The identification of any translating services that may be available at the licensee's primary practice location;

An indication of which managed care plans in which the licensee participates;

An indication of TennCare plans in which the licensee participates;

No information that is otherwise privileged under this title, and that is generated by any peer review program, provider health program, or impaired professionals program operated or administered by a provider association or foundation that such association has created for peer review purposes, shall be included in any profile unless such information is not contemplated by the particular title 63 statute as being privileged;

For the profile of a holder of a certificate of fitness pursuant to § 63-7-123, the name of the holder's collaborating physician; and

For any physician assistant licensed under § 63-19-105, the name of the assistant's collaborating physician.

Each board shall provide individual licensees with a copy of their profiles prior to release to the public. A licensee shall be provided a reasonable time to correct factual inaccuracies that appear in such profile.

A provider may elect to have the provider's profile omit certain information provided pursuant to subdivisions (a)(10)-(12), inclusive, concerning academic appointments and teaching responsibilities, publications in peer-reviewed journals and professional and community service awards. In collecting information for such profiles and in disseminating such profiles, each board shall inform providers that they may choose not to provide such information required pursuant to subdivisions (a)(10)-(12), inclusive.

The department shall develop formats for dissemination of such information to the public, which, at a minimum shall include electronic media, including the world wide web of the internet, and a toll-free telephone line.

On or before January 1, 1999, the division of health related boards of the department shall become a participant in the national practitioners databank.

Individual profiles posted pursuant to § 63-32-107 shall not contain the licensee’s home address and social security number, unless such home address is provided by the licensee, along with a request that it be contained in the profile, as their official mailing or practice address. Notwithstanding this subsection (f), a record containing the home address of the licensee on file with the department of health concerning this chapter shall continue to remain a public record.

Acts 1998, ch. 1073, § 5; 1999, ch. 373, §§ 4, 5; 2000, ch. 589, § 1; 2006, ch. 663, §§ 1, 2; 2012, ch. 798, §§ 52, 53; 2014, ch. 898, § 1; T.C.A § 63-51-105; Acts 2017, ch. 334, § 8; 2018, ch. 610, § 33.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 1999, ch. 373, § 6 provided that the commissioner of health is authorized to set threshold amounts below which judgments or settlements shall not be reportable for providers covered under this chapter, by public necessity [now emergency] rulemaking pursuant to § 4-5-209 [now § 4-5-208].

Former § 63-51-105 was transferred to this section by the authority of the Code Commission in 2017.

For the Preamble to the act relative to the relationship between physicians and advanced practice registered nurses, please refer to Acts 2017, ch. 334.

Amendments. The 2017 amendment divided former (a)(18) into present (a)(18) and (19) by substituting “§ 63-7-123, the name of the holder's collaborating physician; and (19) For any physician assistant” for “§ 63-7-123 or any physician assistant”; and substituted “assistant's supervising physician” for “holder's or assistant's supervising physician” at the end of present (a)(19).

The 2018 amendment substituted “collaborating” for “supervising” in (a)(19).

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 334, § 15. July 1, 2017.

Acts 2018, ch. 610, § 42. July 1, 2018.

Cross-References. Advisory committee for use of the Internet, title 12, ch. 3, part 11.

Electronic bidding, invitations to bid, requests for proposals and other solicitations, § 12-3-704.

Attorney General Opinions. Inclusion of health care provider information in provider profile, OAG 99-061, 1999 Tenn. AG LEXIS 38 (3/10/99).

63-32-106. Conviction of unlicensed provider—Report to relevant board.

The district attorney general for any court in which an unlicensed provider is convicted of being represented as a licensed provider shall, within one (1) week thereafter, report the same to the relevant board together with a copy of the court proceedings in the case.

Acts 1998, ch. 1073, § 6; T.C.A § 63-51-106.

Compiler's Notes. Former § 63-51-106 was transferred to this section by the authority of the Code Commission in 2017.

63-32-107. Publication of provider profiles — Certain restrictions.

The department of health, in implementing § 63-32-105 shall not disseminate a provider profile by electronic media, including the World Wide Web of the internet or toll-free telephone line before May 1, 1999. The department shall conduct a study of the impact of publication of provider profiles by electronic media on the personal safety of providers and their families, and shall report its findings to the government operations committees on or before October 1, 1998. The department shall include in such report a sample profile designed with safeguards recommended by the department pursuant to the aforementioned study. No later than January 1, 1999, and after public hearing, the board shall promulgate regulations to eliminate, to the extent practicable, the possibility that certain information contained in such profiles may jeopardize the personal safety of providers and their families.

Acts 1998, ch. 1073, § 7; T.C.A § 63-51-107.

Compiler's Notes. Former § 63-51-107 was transferred to this section by the authority of the Code Commission in 2017.

Attorney General Opinions. Inclusion of health care provider information in provider profile, OAG 99-061, 1999 Tenn. AG LEXIS 38 (3/10/99).

63-32-108. Assessment of costs.

The department of health shall assess boards of providers that they regulate for the costs reasonably associated with providing the services and information pursuant to this chapter. Further, the department shall provide the cost to the department of commerce and insurance that is associated with providing the services and information relative to the board of pharmacy and managed care organizations. The department of commerce and insurance shall assess the cost to the providers that the department regulates. These costs shall be assessed in compliance with § 9-4-5117 and § 56-1-310.

Acts 1998, ch. 1073, § 8; T.C.A § 63-51-108.

Compiler's Notes. Former § 63-51-108 was transferred to this section by the authority of the Code Commission in 2017.

63-32-109. Costs assessed against boards.

The costs assessed against each board of providers shall be paid from the separate account established pursuant to § 63-1-137 in the general fund for each board.

Acts 1998, ch. 1073, § 9; 1999, ch. 373, § 2; T.C.A § 63-51-109.

Compiler's Notes. Former § 63-51-109 was transferred to this section by the authority of the Code Commission in 2017.

63-32-110. Managed care organizations.

Managed care organizations regulated pursuant to title 56, chapter 32, shall provide an accurate listing of provider information as required by this chapter to the department of health.

A managed care organization shall report any addition or deletion of a provider from its panel of contracted members within twenty-one (21) business days of the date on which the managed care organization receives notice of the addition or deletion of a provider. The department shall cross-reference the change with the existing provider profile within seven (7) days of receipt of the information.

The department of commerce and insurance, to the extent to which it already collects the data required by this chapter, shall forward the existing data and all subsequent data to the department in such manner as the commissioner of health shall direct after consultation with the commissioner of commerce and insurance.

Acts 1998, ch. 1073, § 10; T.C.A § 63-51-110.

Compiler's Notes. Former § 63-51-110 was transferred to this section by the authority of the Code Commission in 2017.

63-32-111. Annual report and provider profiles — Availability.

The annual report required by § 56-32-110(b)(4) [repealed], and information required for a profile by this section shall be made available to consumers by the department of health through the World Wide Web of the internet or a toll-free telephone line. Such information shall be made available by May 1, 1999, and shall be updated by May 1 of each succeeding year.

The information made available by the department pursuant to subsection (a) shall be based on reports filed with the department of commerce and insurance pursuant to § 56-32-110 [repealed], and shall include, to the extent practicable, the following:

A description of the grievance review system;

The total number of grievances handled through such grievance review system, and a compilation of the causes underlying the grievances filed;

The ratio of the number of adverse decisions issued to the number of grievances received;

The ratio of the number of successful grievance appeals to the total number of appeals;

The average of:

The number of enrollees at the beginning of the calendar year; and

The number of enrollees at the end of the calendar year; and

The number, amount and disposition of health care liability claims made by enrollees that resulted in settlements, court judgments and arbitration awards by the plans during the calendar year.

For each year the reports are filed, the information described in subdivisions (b)(2)-(6) shall be shown for a period of five (5) consecutive calendar years. The information for more than five (5) calendar years shall not be required.

The profile of managed care organizations regulated pursuant to title 56, chapter 32, maintained by the department shall include:

The number of years in existence;

A summary of the financial information, including profits or losses, as reported by the plan in its annual statement filed with the commissioner of commerce and insurance;

The geographic plan area for which the plan is authorized;

The composition of the provider network, including names, addresses and specialties of providers;

Identification of those providers that have notified the plan that they are not accepting new patients;

Measures of quality and consumer satisfaction if the commissioner of health determines by rule that such measures are valid and comparable among organizations;

The certification and accreditation status of the organization, if any;

Procedures governing access to specialists and emergency care services; and

The information voluntarily submitted by the managed care organization to the commissioner relative to consumer satisfaction and quality standards or measures.

Acts 1998, ch. 1073, § 11; 2012, ch. 798, § 54; T.C.A § 63-51-111.

Compiler's Notes. Section 56-32-110 referred to in subsections (a) and (b) above was repealed by Acts 2010, ch. 980, § 27, effective January 1, 2011.

Former § 63-51-111 was transferred to this section by the authority of the Code Commission in 2017.

63-32-112. Hospitals.

Hospitals regulated pursuant to title 68, chapter 11, shall provide an accurate listing of information as required by this act to the department of health.

The information that the department shall disseminate shall include, but not be limited to:

The corporate form of the facility, including whether the facility is publicly or privately owned, whether the facility is not-for-profit or for-profit, the nature of the ownership and management, and its affiliations with other corporate entities;

Health care plans accepted by the hospital;

Accreditation status; and

The specialty programs that meet the guidelines established by the specialty societies or other appropriate bodies as determined by the commissioner.

Acts 1998, ch. 1073, § 12; T.C.A § 63-51-112.

Compiler's Notes. Former § 63-51-112 was transferred to this section by the authority of the Code Commission in 2017.

63-32-113. Intentional misrepresentations.

A provider who makes an intentional misrepresentation when providing information to the department of health that the department uses in a provider profile commits a violation of the practice act under which the provider is licensed or certified.

Acts 1998, ch. 1073, § 13; T.C.A § 63-51-113.

Compiler's Notes. Former § 63-51-113 was transferred to this section by the authority of the Code Commission in 2017.

63-32-114. Development of system for collection and dissemination of information.

The initial development of a system for the collection and dissemination of information as provided under this chapter shall be contracted to an appropriate service provider by the department under compliance with title 12, chapters 3 and 4. The cost of such contract shall be paid from fees collected from providers regulated by the division of health related boards.

In disseminating information under this chapter, the department of health is directed to use the department's existing toll-free telephone resources. The creation of an additional toll-free telephone line is not required by this chapter.

Acts 1998, ch. 1073, § 14; T.C.A § 63-51-114.

Compiler's Notes. Former § 63-51-114 was transferred to this section by the authority of the Code Commission in 2017.

63-32-115. Compiling and dissemination of information — Liability of the department of health.

Under this chapter, the department of health only compiles information. The department shall not vouch for or assert the accuracy of any information it disseminates under this chapter. Before the department disseminates information to consumers under this chapter, the department shall permit each provider, hospital, or managed care organization, whose information is to be disseminated, the opportunity to review and correct any information the department proposes to disseminate. The department shall also allow a collaborating physician at any time the opportunity to review, accept, and update the existence of a collaborating relationship between the physician and a physician assistant licensed under § 63-19-105. The department shall also allow a collaborating physician at any time the opportunity to review, accept, and update the existence of a collaborating relationship between the physician and the holder of a certificate of fitness pursuant to § 63-7-123.

On or after January 1, 2015, the collaborative relationship contained in the controlled substance database, as established in title 53, chapter 10, part 3, shall be used by the department to update provider profiles which have been established pursuant to this chapter.

The department shall not be subject to any suit for damages concerning any information that the department disseminates that a provider, hospital, managed care organization, collaborating physician, or supervisory physician had the opportunity to correct, but did not correct.

Nothing contained in this section shall repeal or override the confidentiality provisions contained in title 53, chapter 10, part 3, except to the extent that the department uses the information to update the existence of:

A collaborating relationship between a physician and a holder of a certificate of fitness pursuant to § 63-7-123; or

A collaborating relationship between a physician and a physician assistant licensed under § 63-19-105.

Acts 1998, ch. 1073, § 15; 2014, ch. 898, § 2; T.C.A § 63-51-115; Acts 2017, ch. 334, §§ 9-11; 2018, ch. 610, §§ 34-36.

Compiler's Notes. Former § 63-51-115 was transferred to this section by the authority of the Code Commission in 2017.

For the Preamble to the act relative to the relationship between physicians and advanced practice registered nurses, please refer to Acts 2017, ch. 334.

Amendments. The 2017 amendment, in (a), rewrote the present next to last sentence which read: “The department shall also allow a supervising physician at any time the opportunity to review, accept, and update the existence of a supervisory relationship between the physician and a physician assistant licensed under § 63-19-105.”, and added the last sentence; inserted “collaborating physician,” in (c); and rewrote (d) which read: “Nothing contained in this section shall repeal or override the confidentiality provisions contained in title 53, chapter 10, part 3, except to the extent that the department uses the information to update the existence of a supervisory relationship between a physician and a holder of a certificate of fitness pursuant to § 63-7-123 or a physician assistant licensed under § 63-19-105.”

The 2018 amendment substituted “a physician assistant licensed under § 63-19-105” for “the holder of a certificate of fitness pursuant to § 63-7-123” at the end of the fourth sentence in (a); substituted “collaborative relationship” for “supervisory relationship” in (b) and substituted “collaborating” for “supervisory” in (d)(2).

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 334, § 15. July 1, 2017.

Acts 2018, ch. 610, § 42. July 1, 2018.

63-32-116. Public records.

No provision of this chapter shall be construed as restricting the status of any record as a public record for the purposes of title 10, chapter 7.

Acts 1998, ch. 1073, § 16; T.C.A § 63-51-116.

Compiler's Notes. Former § 63-51-116 was transferred to this section by the authority of the Code Commission in 2017.

63-32-117. Provision of information prior to licensure.

Each licensed provider, as defined in § 63-32-102, must provide the information required by this chapter to be compiled into provider profiles by the department of health.

Each provider, as defined in § 63-32-102, seeking licensure must provide the information required by this chapter before licensure will be granted.

Before the issuance of the licensure renewal notice, the department shall send a notice to each licensed provider at the provider's last known address of record with the department regarding the requirements for information to be submitted by such provider pursuant to this chapter.

Each provider who has submitted information pursuant to this chapter must update that information in writing or online by notifying the department within thirty (30) days after the occurrence of an event or the attainment of a status that is required to be reported. With respect to updated information required to be submitted pursuant to § 63-32-105, the department shall accept information updating a profile as it relates only to a physician licensed pursuant to chapter 6 or 9 of this title if the information is received within thirty (30) days of final payment in writing or online from either the provider or the provider's health care liability carrier and the carrier attests, in writing to the department, that it is the provider's health care liability carrier that has made the payment and that the carrier has confirmed in writing or online to the provider that the information has been reported to the department for purposes of updating the provider's profile.

Failure by a provider to comply with these requirements to submit information and to update information constitutes a ground for disciplinary action under the respective practice act for that profession. For such failure to comply, the department or board may:

Refuse to issue a license to any provider applying for initial licensure who fails to submit or update the required information;

Refuse to renew a license to any provider who fails to submit or update the required information; and/or

Process any licensed provider before the board who fails to submit and/or update the required information for formal disciplinary action, and may assess a penalty against the provider of up to fifty dollars ($50.00) for each day that the provider is not in compliance with this subsection (e).

Acts 1998, ch. 1073, § 17; 2009, ch. 48, § 1; 2012, ch. 798, § 55; 2014, ch. 898, § 3; T.C.A § 63-51-117.

Compiler's Notes. Former § 63-51-117 was transferred to this section by the authority of the Code Commission in 2017.

63-32-118. Violations.

Failure to comply with the requirements of this chapter by a person or entity required to submit or report information as required by this chapter constitutes a violation of the relevant practice or licensing statute and subjects the violator to appropriate enforcement or disciplinary action.

Acts 1998, ch. 1073, § 18; T.C.A § 63-51-118.

Compiler's Notes. Former § 63-51-118 was transferred to this section by the authority of the Code Commission in 2017.

63-32-119. Rules and regulations.

The commissioner of health is authorized to promulgate rules and regulations to effectuate the purposes of this chapter. All such rules and regulations shall be promulgated in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

Acts 1998, ch. 1073, § 19; T.C.A § 63-51-119.

Compiler's Notes. Former § 63-51-119 was transferred to this section by the authority of the Code Commission in 2017.